Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2505
Financial institution, defined.

For purposes of sections 8-2501 to 8-2504, financial institution means a state or federally chartered bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union or any affiliate, subsidiary, or agent thereof.

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 29.